Utah statutes.
41-6a-1702.   Sidewalk -- Driving prohibited -- Exception.

(1)  Except for a bicycle or device propelled by human power, a person may not operate a vehicle on a sidewalk or sidewalk area.

(2)  The provisions of Subsection (1) do not apply on a driveway.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

